Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 3. Construction.

Collateral references. —

Validity and construction of “no damage” clause with respect to delay in building or construction contract. 74 ALR3d 187.

Highway construction contractor’s liability for injuries to third persons by materials or debris on highway during course of construction or repair. 3 ALR4th 770.

Personal injury liability of civil engineer for negligence in highway or bridge construction or maintenance. 43 ALR4th 911.

“Changed conditions” clause in public works or construction contract with state or its subdivision. 56 ALR4th 1042.

Highway contractor’s liability to highway user for highway surface defects. 62 ALR4th 1067.

Sec. 19.10.170.
Construction by department.

Except as provided in AS

44.33.300

, it is the general policy of the state to require the construction of all highways under bid contract in accordance with AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code). However, subject to the provisions of (b) of this section, when the estimated cost of a construction project is less than $100,000 or when it appears to be in the best interests of the state, the department may perform the work notwithstanding any other provisions of law.

Construction or professional services in connection with the construction of highways performed by the department under (a) of this section that have an estimated cost exceeding $5,000 may not be performed by the department unless the commissioner determines, in writing, that the cost to the state will be less than that incurred as a result of a formally advertised or negotiated contract. The determination of the commissioner shall be supported by findings of fact which shall set out enough facts and circumstances to clearly justify the determination. The determinations and findings shall be maintained as a permanent record of the department.

In this section, “professional services” means architectural, engineering, or land surveying services.

History.

(§ 1 art III title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 277 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 104 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 144 SLA 1982; am § 13 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Neither this section nor AS

35.15.010

is concerned with design services involving a highway or public work that is not in the actual stage of ongoing construction, and neither is applicable to projects that are let out for construction under the competitive bidding statutes. November 21, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets and Bridges, § 74 et seq.

40 C.J.S., Highways, § 175 et seq.

Existence of actionable defect in street or highway proper as question for court or for jury. 1 ALR3d 496.

Liability, in motor vehicle related cases, of governmental entity for injury or death resulting from defect or obstruction on roadside parkway or parking strip. 98 ALR3d 439.

Sec. 19.10.180.
Request for public bids; contracts for materials and supplies.

Requests for public bids are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).
The request for public bids may require the contractor to furnish equipment, labor, materials, and supplies for the project, or it may state that the department will furnish the materials and supplies.
If the department elects to provide materials and supplies for a project, it shall do so at the time it adopts the construction program. The department shall acquire these materials and supplies under AS 36.30 by requesting bids for them according to the class, type, and nature of the materials and supplies.
The contract for materials and supplies may be awarded either upon the basis of delivery to the construction project directly or to a central storehouse or storehouses maintained by the department.
Those materials and supplies so purchased by the department may be delivered to the project site without expense to the contractor, or it may sell them to the contractor at cost and make the materials and supplies a part of the construction cost.

History.

(§ 3 art III title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 14 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Collateral references. —

Right of bidder for state or municipal contract to rescind bid on ground that bid was based upon his own mistake or that of his employee. 2 A.L.R.4th 991.

Sec. 19.10.190.
Advertisement, bids, contracts, and informal bids. [Repealed, § 67 ch 106 SLA 1986. For current law, see AS 36.30.]

Sec. 19.10.200.
Procedures for the award of contracts.

The award of a contract for highway construction work is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code), AS 19.05 — AS 19.25, and regulations adopted under those laws.

History.

(§ 5 art III title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 15 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Opinions of attorney general. —

A policy of publishing regulations concerning bidding and letting of contracts in the Administrative Code is consistent with the Alaska Administrative Procedure Act (AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.950

), since these regulations are regulations in which an important portion of the public has a vital interest and since they are of great use to the portion of the public interested in dealing and contracting with the state. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 27.

Collateral references. —

Waiver of competitive bidding requirements for state and local public building and construction contracts. 40 ALR4th 968.

Authority of state or its subdivision to reject all bids for public contract. 52 ALR4th 186.

Sec. 19.10.210.
Award of contracts to lowest responsible bidder. [Repealed, § 67 ch 106 SLA 1986. For current law, see AS 36.30.]

Sec. 19.10.220.
Prior contracts unaffected.

[Repealed, § 43 ch 85 SLA 1988.]

.

Sec. 19.10.230.
Method of construction of highway ditches.

A highway constructed or reconstructed shall be designed to permit water to drain from it into ditches which shall drain into coulees, rivers, and lakes according to the surface and terrain where the highway is constructed in accordance with scientific highway construction and engineering in order to prevent the water from overflowing onto adjacent and adjoining land.
The natural flow and drainage of surface water may not be obstructed, but it shall be permitted to follow the natural course according to the surface and terrain.

History.

(§ 7 art IV title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 19.10.240.
Warning signs of road construction.

Whenever the department enters into a contract for the construction of a highway, it shall, as a condition of the contract, provide that the contractor shall place suitable warning signs that can be read from a distance of 100 feet in daytime, and that the contractor shall erect and place at night a red and white lantern or a torch or other effective device, of a type approved by the department, at both ends of the construction work, not less than 300 feet from it, warning the public that the road is under construction or improvement and is closed, impassable, or dangerous for travel. This section does not make the state liable for the failure of a contractor to erect warning signs.

History.

(§ 9 art IV title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

Sec. 19.10.250.
Penalty for failure to erect warning signs.

A contractor, foreman, or person in charge of work or repairs on a highway who fails or neglects to erect and maintain suitable warning signs as provided in AS

19.10.240

is punishable by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $50, or by imprisonment in jail for not more than 60 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 10 art IV title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Cross references. —

For another provision governing penalties applicable to this chapter, see AS

19.59.002

.

Sec. 19.10.260.
Replacement of permanent markers and filing of right-of-way map after construction.

The department shall

replace all permanent markers on private or municipal property that were destroyed or lost during highway construction to permit persons to determine accurately new boundary lines resulting from the construction;

file and record in the local recording district, after completion of highway construction, an accurate right-of-way map that will contain sufficient engineering and survey information designating where the resulting boundary lines are located on private or municipal property along the highway.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 19.10.270.
Highway construction near airports.

A person may not construct, reconstruct, relocate, or extend a federal-aid highway within two miles of an airport, airstrip, or private air facility without first obtaining the written approval of the commissioner, as provided by regulation.

The commissioner may not approve the construction, reconstruction, relocation, or extension of a highway under this section if the construction would constitute a hazard to the traveling public or if the construction would otherwise not be in the public interest.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations to implement the purpose of this section that are consistent with standards established by participating federal agencies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

19.20.090

. Renumbered as AS

19.45.015

in 1981. Renumbered again in 1996.

Sec. 19.10.280.
[Renumbered as AS 19.20.015.]